Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202279-8,152
Program; amount; limitation.

The total amount of student loan repayment assistance awarded pursuant to the program shall not exceed five million dollars in any fiscal year.

Laws 2022, LB1218, § 7.